Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 6. WATER AND WASTEWATER

SUBTITLE C. SPECIAL UTILITY DISTRICTS

CHAPTER 7203. EAST MEDINA COUNTY SPECIAL UTILITY DISTRICT

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 7203.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Board" means the board of directors of the district.

(2) "Director" means a member of the board.

(3) "District" means the East Medina County Special Utility District.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 453 (S.B. 1851), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2005.

Sec. 7203.002. DISTRICT TERRITORY. The district's boundaries are coextensive with the boundaries of the territory that is described by certificate of convenience and necessity number 10217.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 453 (S.B. 1851), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2005.

SUBCHAPTER B. BOARD OF DIRECTORS

Sec. 7203.051. BOARD OF DIRECTORS. The board consists of seven directors.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 453 (S.B. 1851), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2005.